Indiana, session 2026, HB1380.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 1-1-11-3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. The governor shall issue a proclamation
annually setting apart and designating June 12 as Women Veteran
Recognition Day, and recommending in the proclamation that the
day be observed by the people in celebrating the many
contributions of women to our military forces.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1380—LS 6656/DI 116